Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Community Education Program

History.

2020 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 105, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 35-25-401.
Female genital mutilation education program.

The department of health, the attorney general’s office division of victim services or the department of health and attorney general’s office division of victim services together shall develop a community education program regarding female genital mutilation. The program shall include:

Education, prevention and outreach materials regarding the health risks and emotional trauma inflicted by the practice of female genital mutilation;

Ways to develop and disseminate information regarding recognizing the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation;

Training materials for law enforcement, teachers and others who are mandated reporters under W.S. 14-3-205(a), encompassing:

Risk factors associated with female genital mutilation;

Signs that an individual may be a victim of female genital mutilation;

Best practices for responses to victims of female genital mutilation; and

The criminal penalties associated with the facilitation or commission of female genital mutilation.

Law enforcement, teachers and others who are mandated reporters under W.S. 14-3-205(a) shall incorporate the training under this section into their professional development programs and shall provide the training to employees and volunteers. To assist state and local entities in disseminating the education program under this section, the department of health, the attorney general’s office division of victim services or the department of health and attorney general’s office division of victim services together shall provide necessary training programs and technical assistance as requested.

History.

2020 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 105, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.